cs: Typ příslušenství pro vzory šití: Zástěry; Batohy; Tašky a kabelky; Pásky; Roušky; Rukavice a palčáky; Vlasové doplňky; Klobouky a čepice; Šperky (textilní); Doplňky pro domácí mazlíčky; Kapsičky a taštičky na zip; Šály a šátky; Ponožky a bačkory; Technologické doplňky (textilní pouzdra); Kravaty a motýlky; Cestovní doplňky; Peněženky a pouzdra na karty; Jiné
pl: Typ akcesorium do wykroju krawieckiego: Fartuchy; Plecaki; Torby i torebki; Paski; Maseczki ochronne; Rękawiczki i rękawice; Akcesoria do włosów; Czapki i kapelusze; Biżuteria (materiałowa); Akcesoria dla zwierząt; Saszetki i kosmetyczki; Szaliki i chusty; Skarpetki i kapcie; Akcesoria technologiczne (materiałowe etui); Krawaty i muchy; Akcesoria podróżne; Portfele i etui na karty; Inne
vi: Loại phụ kiện mẫu may: Tạp dề; Ba lô; Túi xách & túi tote; Thắt lưng; Khẩu trang; Găng tay; Phụ kiện tóc; Mũ và nón; Trang sức (bằng vải); Phụ kiện cho thú cưng; Túi phụ kiện và túi có khóa kéo; Khăn quàng và khăn choàng; Tất và dép đi trong nhà; Phụ kiện công nghệ (bao/túi vải); Cà vạt và nơ; Phụ kiện du lịch; Ví và ngăn đựng thẻ; Khác
lt-LT: Siuvimo modelio aksesuaro tipas: Prijuostės; Kuprinės; Krepšiai ir rankinės; Diržai; Veido kaukės; Pirštinės; Plaukų aksesuarai; Skrybėlės ir kepurės; Papuošalai (medžiaginiai); Augintinių aksesuarai; Maišeliai ir krepšeliai su užtrauktukais; Šalikai ir skaros; Kojinės ir šlepetės; Technikos priedai (medžiaginiai dėklai); Kaklaraiščiai ir varlytės; Kelionių aksesuarai; Piniginės ir kortelių dėklai; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de acessório do molde de costura: Aventais; Mochilas; Sacos e malas; Cintos; Máscaras faciais; Luvas e mitenes; Acessórios para o cabelo; Chapéus e bonés; Bijuteria (tecido); Acessórios para animais de estimação; Bolsas e sacos com fecho; Cachecóis e xailes; Meias e chinelos; Acessórios tecnológicos (estojos em tecido); Gravatas e laços; Acessórios de viagem; Carteiras e porta-cartões; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta modnega dodatka šivalnega kroja: Predpasniki; Nahrbtniki; Torbe in cekarji; Pasovi; Obrazne maske; Rokavice; Dodatki za lase; Klobuki in kape; Nakit (iz blaga); Dodatki za hišne ljubljenčke; Torbice in vrečke z zadrgo; Šali in ogrinjala; Nogavice in copati; Tehnološki dodatki (ovitki iz blaga); Kravate in metuljčki; Potovalni dodatki; Denarnice in etuiji za kartice; Drugo
ko: 재봉 패턴 액세서리 유형: 앞치마; 백팩; 가방 및 토트; 벨트; 마스크; 장갑 및 벙어리장갑; 헤어 액세서리; 모자; 주얼리(패브릭); 반려동물 액세서리; 파우치 및 지퍼 백; 스카프 및 랩; 양말 및 슬리퍼; 테크 액세서리(패브릭 케이스); 타이 및 보우 타이; 여행용 액세서리; 지갑 및 카드 홀더; 기타
zh-TW: 縫紉樣板配件類型: 圍裙; 背包; 包款與托特包; 皮帶; 口罩; 手套與連指手套; 髮飾; 帽款; 飾品 (布料); 寵物配件; 收納包與拉鍊袋; 圍巾與披肩; 襪子與室內拖鞋; 科技配件 (布料保護套); 領帶與領結; 旅行配件; 錢包與票卡夾; 其他
es: Tipo de accesorio para patrones de costura: Delantales; Mochilas; Bolsos y totes; Cinturones; Mascarillas; Guantes y mitones; Accesorios para el cabello; Sombreros y gorras; Joyería (tela); Accesorios para mascotas; Estuches y bolsas con cremallera; Bufandas y chales; Calcetines y zapatillas; Accesorios tecnológicos (fundas de tela); Corbatas y pajaritas; Accesorios de viaje; Billeteras y tarjeteros; Otro
sv: Typ av tillbehör till symönster: Förkläden; Ryggsäckar; Väskor och tygkassar; Bälten; Ansiktsmasker; Handskar och vantar; Håraccessoarer; Hattar och mössor; Smycken (tyg); Husdjurstillbehör; Påsar och dragkedjeväskor; Halsdukar och sjalar; Strumpor och tofflor; Tekniktillbehör (tygfodral); Slipsar och flugor; Resetillbehör; Plånböcker och korthållare; Övrigt
da: Tilbehørstype for symønster: Forklæder; Rygsække; Tasker og muleposer; Bælter; Mundbind; Handsker og vanter; Hårtilbehør; Hatte og kasketter; Smykker (stof); Tilbehør til kæledyr; Punge og lynlåstasker; Tørklæder og sjaler; Strømper og hjemmesko; Elektroniktilbehør (stofetuier); Slips og butterfly; Rejsetilbehør; Punge og kortholdere; Andet
ru: Тип аксессуара по выкройке: Фартуки; Рюкзаки; Сумки и шопперы; Ремни; Маски для лица; Перчатки и варежки; Аксессуары для волос; Головные уборы; Украшения (из ткани); Аксессуары для питомцев; Косметички и сумочки на молнии; Шарфы и палантины; Носки и тапочки; Аксессуары для техники (тканевые чехлы); Галстуки и бабочки; Дорожные аксессуары; Кошельки и кардхолдеры; Другое
fr: Type d’accessoire du patron de couture: Tabliers; Sacs à dos; Sacs et cabas; Ceintures; Masques de protection; Gants et mitaines; Accessoires pour cheveux; Chapeaux et casquettes; Bijoux (tissu); Accessoires pour animaux; Pochettes et sacs zippés; Écharpes et châles; Chaussettes et chaussons; Accessoires high-tech (étuis en tissu); Cravates et nœuds papillon; Accessoires de voyage; Portefeuilles et porte-cartes; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta pribora za šivaći kroj: Pregače; Ruksaci; Torbe; Remeni; Maske za lice; Rukavice s prstima i bez prstiju; Dodaci za kosu; Šeširi i kape; Nakit (tkanina); Dodaci za kućne ljubimce; Torbice i torbe s patentnim zatvaračem; Šalovi i marame; Čarape i papuče; Tehnološki dodaci (futrole od tkanine); Kravate i leptir mašne; Putni dodaci; Novčanici i etuiji za kartice; Ostalo
fi: Kaavan asustetyyppi: Esiliinat; Reput; Laukut ja kassit; Vyöt; Kasvomaskit; Sormikkaat ja lapaset; Hiusasusteet; Hatut ja lippalakit; Korut (kangas); Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet; Pussukat ja vetoketjupussit; Huivit ja hartiahuivit; Sukat ja tossut; Laitetarvikkeet (kangaskotelot); Solmiot ja rusetit; Matkatarvikkeet; Lompakot ja korttikotelot; Muu
zh-CN: 缝纫图纸配件类型: 围裙; 背包; 包袋与托特包; 腰带; 口罩; 手套和连指手套; 发饰; 帽子; 首饰（布艺）; 宠物配饰; 小包与拉链袋; 围巾与披肩; 袜子和拖鞋; 数码配件（布艺保护套）; 领带和领结; 旅行配件; 钱包和卡包; 其他
pt-BR: Molde de costura tipo de acessório: Aventais; Mochilas; Bolsas e sacolas; Cintos; Máscaras faciais; Luvas e mitenes; Acessórios de cabelo; Chapéus e bonés; Joias (tecido); Acessórios para pets; Bolsas e nécessaires; Cachecóis e xales; Meias e pantufas; Acessórios de tecnologia (capas de tecido); Gravatas e gravatas-borboleta; Acessórios de viagem; Carteiras e porta-cartões; Outros
it: Tipo di accessorio del cartamodello: Grembiuli; Zaini; Borse; Cinture; Mascherine; Guanti e moffole; Accessori per capelli; Cappelli e berretti; Gioielli (in tessuto); Accessori per animali; Astucci e borse con cerniera; Sciarpe e stole; Calzini e pantofole; Accessori tecnologici (custodie in tessuto); Cravatte e papillon; Accessori da viaggio; Portafogli e portatessere; Altro
bg-BG: Вид аксесоар за шевни кройки: Престилки; Раници; Чанти и торби; Колани; Маски за лице; Ръкавици; Аксесоари за коса; Шапки и каскети; Бижута (от плат); Аксесоари за домашни любимци; Несесери и чантички с цип; Шалове и наметки; Чорапи и пантофи; Технологични аксесоари (калъфи от плат); Вратовръзки и папионки; Аксесоари за пътуване; Портфейли и картодържатели; Друго
ja: 縫製パターンアクセサリータイプ: エプロン; バックパック; バッグ・トート; ベルト; フェイスマスク; 手袋・ミトン; ヘアアクセサリー; 帽子・キャップ; ジュエリー (ファブリック); ペットアクセサリー; ポーチ・ファスナー付きバッグ; スカーフ・ラップ; 靴下・スリッパ; テックアクセサリー (ファブリックケース); ネクタイ・蝶ネクタイ; トラベルアクセサリー; 財布・カードホルダー; その他
en: Sewing pattern accessory type: Aprons; Backpacks; Bags & totes; Belts; Face masks; Gloves & mittens; Hair accessories; Hats & caps; Jewelry (fabric); Pet accessories; Pouches & zipper bags; Scarves & wraps; Socks & slippers; Tech accessories (fabric cases); Ties & bow ties; Travel accessories; Wallets & card holders; Other
nb: Type tilbehør til symønster: Forklær; Ryggsekker; Vesker og handlenett; Belter; Munnbind; Hansker og votter; Hårtilbehør; Hatter og capser; Smykker (stoff); Kjæledyrtilbehør; Punger og glidelåsvesker; Skjerf og sjal; Sokker og tøfler; Teknologitilbehør (stoffetui); Slips og sløyfer; Reisetilbehør; Lommebøker og kortholdere; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de accesoriu pentru tipar de croitorie: Șorțuri; Rucsacuri; Genți și plase; Curele; Măști faciale; Mănuși cu degete și fără degete; Accesorii pentru păr; Pălării și șepci; Bijuterii (material textil); Accesorii pentru animale de companie; Portofele și genți cu fermoar; Eșarfe și șaluri; Șosete și papuci; Accesorii tehnice (huse din material textil); Cravate și papioane; Accesorii de călătorie; Portofele și suporturi pentru carduri; Altele
sk-SK: Typ príslušenstva k šijaciemu strihu: Zástery; Batohy; Tašky a kabelky; Opasky; Rúška; Rukavice (prstové a palčiaky); Vlasové doplnky; Klobúky a čiapky; Šperky (látkové); Doplnky pre domáce zvieratá; Puzdrá a vrecúška na zips; Šály a šatky; Ponožky a papuče; Technologické príslušenstvo (látkové obaly); Kravaty a motýliky; Cestovné doplnky; Peňaženky a puzdrá na karty; Iné
de: Zubehörart des Schnittmusters: Schürzen; Rucksäcke; Taschen & Shopper; Gürtel; Gesichtsmasken; Handschuhe & Fäustlinge; Haar-Accessoires; Hüte & Mützen; Schmuck (Stoff); Haustier-Zubehör; Etuis & Reißverschlusstaschen; Schals & Tücher; Socken & Hausschuhe; Tech-Zubehör (Stoffhüllen); Krawatten & Fliegen; Reisezubehör; Portemonnaies & Kartenetuis; Andere
nl: Naaipatroon accessoiretype: Schorten; Rugzakken; Tassen en draagtassen; Riemen; Mondkapjes; Handschoenen en wanten; Haaraccessoires; Hoeden en petten; Sieraden (stof); Huisdieraccessoires; Etuis en ritszakjes; Sjaals en omslagdoeken; Sokken en pantoffels; Tech-accessoires (stoffen hoezen); Stropdassen en vlinderdassen; Reisaccessoires; Portemonnees en pashouders; Overig
tr: Dikiş kalıbı aksesuar türü: Önlükler; Sırt çantaları; Çantalar ve el çantaları; Kemerler; Yüz maskeleri; Eldivenler; Saç aksesuarları; Şapkalar ve kasketler; Takı (kumaş); Evcil hayvan aksesuarları; Keseler ve fermuarlı çantalar; Atkılar ve şallar; Çoraplar ve terlikler; Teknoloji aksesuarları (kumaş kılıflar); Kravatlar ve papyonlar; Seyahat aksesuarları; Cüzdanlar ve kartlıklar; Diğer
el: Τύπος αξεσουάρ πατρόν ραπτικής: Ποδιές; Σακίδια πλάτης; Τσάντες και τσάντες ώμου; Ζώνες; Μάσκες προσώπου; Γάντια; Αξεσουάρ μαλλιών; Καπέλα και σκούφοι; Κοσμήματα (υφασμάτινα); Αξεσουάρ κατοικίδιων; Νεσεσέρ και τσαντάκια με φερμουάρ; Κασκόλ και εσάρπες; Κάλτσες και παντόφλες; Αξεσουάρ τεχνολογίας (υφασμάτινες θήκες); Γραβάτες και παπιγιόν; Αξεσουάρ ταξιδιού; Πορτοφόλια και θήκες καρτών; Άλλο
hu: Varrásminta-kiegészítő típusa: Kötények; Hátizsákok; Táskák és szatyrok; Övek; Arcmaszkok; Kesztyűk és ujjatlan kesztyűk; Hajkiegészítők; Kalapok és sapkák; Ékszerek (szövet); Kisállat kiegészítők; Tasakok és cipzáras táskák; Sálak és kendők; Zoknik és papucsok; Technikai kiegészítők (szövet tokok); Nyakkendők és csokornyakkendők; Utazási kiegészítők; Pénztárcák és kártyatartók; Egyéb
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์เสริมแพทเทิร์นเย็บผ้า: ผ้ากันเปื้อน; กระเป๋าเป้; กระเป๋าและกระเป๋าโท้ท; เข็มขัด; หน้ากากอนามัย; ถุงมือแบบแยกนิ้วและรวบนิ้ว; เครื่องประดับผม; หมวกและหมวกแก๊ป; เครื่องประดับ (ผ้า); อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับสัตว์เลี้ยง; กระเป๋าใบเล็กและกระเป๋าซิป; ผ้าพันคอและผ้าคลุมไหล่; ถุงเท้าและสลิปเปอร์; อุปกรณ์เสริมไอที (เคสผ้า); เนคไทและโบว์ไท; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเดินทาง; กระเป๋าสตางค์และที่ใส่บัตร; อื่นๆ